Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2098.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5333YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2098 Section 1. Section 232.69, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 1. The classes of persons enumerated in this subsection 3 shall make a report within twenty-four hours and as provided 4 in section 232.70 , of cases of child abuse. In addition, 5 the classes of persons enumerated in this subsection shall 6 make a report of abuse of a child which would be defined as 7 child abuse under section 232.68, subsection 2 , paragraph 8 âaâ , subparagraph (3) or (5), except that the abuse resulted 9 from the acts or omissions of a person other than a person 10 responsible for the care of the child. 11 a. Every For purposes of this section, all of the following 12 classes of persons are mandatory reporters: 13 (1) A health practitioner who in the scope of professional 14 practice, examines, attends, or treats a child and who 15 reasonably believes the child has been abused. Notwithstanding 16 section 139A.30 , this provision applies to a health 17 practitioner who receives information confirming that a child 18 is infected with a sexually transmitted disease . 19 b. Any of the following persons who, in the scope of 20 professional practice or in their employment responsibilities, 21 examines, attends, counsels, or treats a child and reasonably 22 believes a child has suffered abuse: 23 (1) (2) A social worker. 24 (2) (3) An employee or operator of a public or private 25 health care facility as health care facility is defined in 26 section 135C.1 . 27 (3) (4) A certified psychologist. 28 (4) (5) A licensed school employee, certified 29 para-educator, holder of a coaching authorization issued under 30 section 256.165 , school employee who is eighteen years of age 31 or older, or an instructor employed by a community college. 32 (5) (6) An employee or operator of a licensed child 33 care center, registered child development home, head start 34 program, family development and self-sufficiency grant program 35 -1- LSB 5333YH (3) 91 dg/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 2098 under section 216A.107 , or healthy opportunities for parents 1 to experience success â healthy families Iowa program under 2 section 135.106 . 3 (6) (7) An employee or operator of a substance use disorder 4 program or facility licensed under chapter 125 . 5 (7) (8) An employee of a department institution listed in 6 section 218.1 . 7 (8) (9) An employee or operator of a juvenile detention or 8 juvenile shelter care facility approved under section 232.142 . 9 (9) (10) An employee or operator of a child foster care 10 facility under chapter 237 . 11 (10) (11) An employee or operator of a community mental 12 health center as that term is defined in section 225A.1 . 13 (11) (12) A peace officer. 14 (12) (13) A counselor or mental health professional. 15 (13) (14) An employee or operator of a provider of 16 services to children funded under a federally approved medical 17 assistance home and community-based services waiver. 18 (14) (15) An employee, operator, owner, or other person who 19 performs duties for a childrenâs residential facility certified 20 under chapter 237C . 21 (15) (16) A massage therapist licensed pursuant to chapter 22 152C . 23 b. A mandatory reporter shall make a child abuse report 24 as provided by section 232.70, within twenty-four hours of 25 examining, attending, counseling, or treating a child within 26 the scope of the mandatory reporterâs professional practice 27 or while performing the mandatory reporterâs employment 28 responsibilities, if any of the following are true: 29 (1) The mandatory reporter forms a reasonable belief that a 30 child has suffered child abuse. 31 (2) The mandatory reporter forms a reasonable belief that a 32 child has suffered child abuse as defined under section 232.68, 33 subsection 2, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (3) or (5), except 34 that the abuse resulted from the acts or omissions of a person 35 -2- LSB 5333YH (3) 91 dg/ko 2/ 4 H.F. 2098 other than a person responsible for the care of the child. 1 (3) If the mandatory reporter is a health practitioner, 2 the mandatory reporter received confirmation that a child is 3 infected with a sexually transmitted disease. 4 (4) The mandatory reporter learns that a person who 5 previously had the personâs parental rights to a child 6 terminated due to child abuse is the biological parent of a 7 newborn child. 8 2. Any other person who believes that a child has been 9 abused has knowledge that would require a mandatory reporter to 10 make a report under subsection 1, paragraph âbâ , is a permissive 11 reporter, and may make a report as provided in section 232.70 . 12 Sec. 2. Section 232.70, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 13 to read as follows: 14 1. Each report made by a mandatory reporter, as defined 15 described in section 232.69, subsection 1 , or a permissive 16 reporter, as defined described in section 232.69, subsection 17 2 , shall be oral. 18 Sec. 3. Section 232.70, subsection 4, paragraph a, Code 19 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 a. Immediately make a determination as to whether the report 21 constitutes an any of the following: 22 (1) An allegation of child abuse as defined in section 23 232.68 . 24 (2) An allegation of child abuse as defined in section 25 232.68, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (3) or (5), 26 except that the abuse resulted from the acts or omissions of 27 a person other than a person responsible for the care of the 28 child. 29 (3) Confirmation that a child is infected with a sexually 30 transmitted disease. 31 (4) An allegation that a person who previously had the 32 personâs parental rights to a child terminated due to child 33 abuse is the biological parent of a newborn child. 34 Sec. 4. Section 232.71B, subsection 1, paragraph a, 35 -3- LSB 5333YH (3) 91 dg/ko 3/ 4 H.F. 2098 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 If the department determines a report constitutes a child 3 abuse an allegation or confirmation under section 232.70, 4 subsection 4, paragraph âaâ , the department shall promptly 5 commence either a child abuse assessment within twenty-four 6 hours of receiving the report or a family assessment within 7 seventy-two hours of receiving the report. 8